Vermont statutes. Title 31 Recreation and Sports
Subchapter 2. Fairs and Theatres

§ 441.
Regulation of shows and games of chance.

The officers of a town fair association may regulate and prevent theatrical, circus, or mountebank exhibitions and shows, or traffic in fruits, goods, wares, and merchandise of whatever description, the trading of horses, and games of chance, on fair days, within a distance of 200 yards in any highway leading to or passing a fairground, if in the opinion of such officers the same would obstruct or interfere with the free and uninterrupted use of such highways.
The police employed by such association shall have the same power in respect to such matters on such highways as they have within such grounds.

§ 442.
Licenses for theatres and similar entertainment.

The selectboard of a town, trustees of an incorporated village, and the aldermen of a city may grant licenses and fix a fee therefor, for theatres, shows, moving picture shows, or concert halls operated and maintained for profit, may revoke the same, and may also, after hearing, refuse to grant such a license when, in their judgment, the public good requires.

§ 443.
Operating without license.

A person who installs, operates, or maintains a theatre, show, moving picture show, or concert hall without first obtaining a license therefor, if required by the selectboard of a town, the trustees of an incorporated village, or the aldermen of a city, as provided in section 442 of this title, shall be fined not more than $100.00 for each day on which he or she so operates or maintains the same.
Such fine shall be paid to the town treasurer for the benefit of the town.

§ 444.
[Omitted.]